Tennessee, session 114, HB2601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2008(f), is amended by deleting
"fifteenth day" wherever it appears in the subsection and substituting instead "twentieth day".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2601
012753
- 1 -